Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.210

Use of restraint or isolation—Requirement for procedures to notify parent or guardian—Additional procedures for compliance.

A student's individualized education program must include procedures for notification of a parent or guardian regarding the use of restraint or isolation under RCW 28A.600.485. If a student is placed in an authorized entity under RCW 28A.155.060, the student's individualized education program must also specify any additional procedures required to ensure the authorized entity fully complies with RCW 28A.600.485.

[ 2023 c 436 s 7; 2013 c 202 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 436: See note following RCW 28A.300.690.

Findings—2013 c 202: See note following RCW 28A.600.485.